Louisiana, session 2026, HB621.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Part I of Chapter 12 of Title 30 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 30:1121 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
PART I. GENERAL PROVISIONS
§1121. Recycling; renewable energy
Any decommissioning plan required for a renewable energy facility shall
provide for the recycling of component parts of the facility to the extent practicable,
in accordance with the Department of Environmental Quality regulations pertaining
to Universal Wastes in Chapter 38 of Part V of Title 33 of the Louisiana
Administrative Code, Recyclable Materials in Chapter 41 of Part V of Title 33 of the
Louisiana Administrative Code, or Recycling and Waste Reduction Rules in Chapter
103 of Part VII of Title 33 of the Louisiana Administrative Code, except those parts
required to be disposed of otherwise by Subtitle II of this Title.
Section 2. The Louisiana State Law Institute is hereby authorized and directed to:
(A) Redesignate the part heading of R.S. 30:1131, "PART I. BATTERIES" as
"PART II. BATTERIES".
(B) Redesignate the part heading of R.S. 30:1141, "PART II. WIND ENERGY" as
"PART III. WIND ENERGY".
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 621 ENROLLED
(C) Redesignate the part heading of R.S. 30:1142, "PART III. SOLAR POWER
GENERATION FACILITIES" as "PART IV. SOLAR POWER GENERATION
FACILITIES".
Section 3. This Act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.